Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4744
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the Infant Hearing Act.

Laws 2000, LB 950, § 11;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 51;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 598.